Tennessee, session 114, SB2135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before December 31, 2026, the department of revenue is urged to
study the amount of revenue derived during the previous five (5) fiscal years from the tax
imposed by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228, on retail sales of non-prepared
food, such as fruit and vegetables that are fresh, frozen, or canned, and retail sales of prepared
food. Within ninety (90) days from the conclusion of the study, the department shall submit a
report to the chair of the finance, ways and means committee of the senate, the chair of the
committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over taxes, and the office of
legislative budget analysis identifying the amounts and providing any findings or
recommendations.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2135
010783
- 1 -